Massachusetts, session 194th, H79.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 25C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 10. An internet service provider providing internet service to a household
receiving a benefit under the federal Affordable Connectivity Program shall, if the household is
an existing customer of the internet service provider prior to receiving the benefit, provide
internet service to the household receiving the benefit without interruption or delay in existing
service.
The department shall promulgate regulations for the implementation and enforcement of
this section.
of 1